Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-731
Teams; exempt from Open Meetings Act.

The teams established by sections 28-728 to 28-730 shall not be considered a public body for purposes of the Open Meetings Act.

Laws 1992, LB 1184, § 4;

Laws 2004, LB 821, § 10.

Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.